Utah statutes.
59-12-2102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Annexation" means an annexation to a city or town under Title 10, Chapter 2, Part 4, Annexation.

(2)  "Annexing area" means an area that is annexed into a city or town.



Enacted by Chapter 323, 2008 General Session

